Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5663.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 13-13 of the General Laws entitled "Interstate Detainers" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
13-13-9. Immigration detainers.
All state law enforcement agencies including, but not limited to, the division of sheriffs
and the department of corrections shall honor all detainer requests and any other holds from the
Department of Homeland Security and Immigration and Custom Enforcement. Any person with a
detainer request or other hold, of which the state agency has been made aware, shall hold said
person in custody until Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE) can take custody of said
person.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001041
========